Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-260
Deeds and other instruments; recorded for more than ten years; effective as notice despite formal defects.

From and after its validation by the operation of section 76-258, such instrument shall impart notice to subsequent purchasers, encumbrancers, and all other persons whomsoever so far as and to the same extent that the same is recorded, notwithstanding such defects, irregularities or omissions; and such instrument, the record thereof, or a duly authenticated copy shall be competent evidence to the same extent as such instrument would have been competent if valid in the first instance.

Laws 1941, c. 152, § 3, p. 593;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 76-278;

R.S.1943, § 76-260.